Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2549
Joint public agency; status.

A joint public agency created by public agencies pursuant to the Joint Public Agency Act shall not be considered a state agency, and an employee of such an entity or agency shall not be considered a state employee.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 49.